Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1002
Basic workweek; state institutions; hours required.

All heads of institutions and their deputies, assistants, and employees, except part-time employees, shall render not less than forty hours of labor each week.

Laws 1957, c. 398, § 2, p. 1364.